Wyoming, session 2026, HB0174.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 37-3-120 is created to read:

37-3-120. Choice electric program; requirements.

(a) As used in this section:

(i) "Electric utility" means any person,
including cooperative electric utilities that perform any
HB0174

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0338
of the functions specified in W.S. 37-1-101(a)(vi)(C), that
is authorized to engage in business in Wyoming and that is
primarily engaged in the generation, transmission or sale
of electric energy. "Electric utility" shall include any
electric utility owned or operated by a city or town;

(ii) "Resource type" means the fuel for or
source of electricity that an electric utility generates or
purchases for sale to the customers of the electric
utility.

(b) The commission shall promulgate rules that
require each electric utility to establish a choice
electric program. Rules promulgated under this section
shall include, at a minimum:

(i) Requirements for each electric utility to
offer electricity for sale to its customers by each
resource type that the electric utility offers or by a
combination of resource types;

(ii) Requirements for each electric utility to
determine prices for each resource type to be made
HB0174

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0338
available for sale to its customers. As part of the rules
promulgated in accordance with this paragraph, the
commission shall require each electric utility to include:

(A) Pricing information for the production
cost of the resource type, transmission and delivery costs
and administrative costs;

(B) Pricing information for the purchase of
electricity from the electric utility without regard to or
a percentage allocation of resource types;

(C) If the electric utility offers resource
types that are not reliable as defined by W.S.
37-18-101(a)(iv) or dispatchable as defined by W.S.
37-18-101(a)(ii), information on how the electric utility
purchases other resource types to ensure that demand is met
and the costs that a choice electric customer may incur as
a result of these purchases;

(D) The actual cost of the resource type
without applying or including any grants, tax exemptions or
HB0174

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0338
subsidies received by the electric utility for that
resource type.

(iii) A requirement for each electric utility to
allow customers to specify different percentages for
resource types in their purchase of electricity;

(iv) A requirement for each electric utility to
list and provide information on an electric cost adjustment
rate or regulated rate to its customers that specifies the
cost of electricity based on the delivery of electricity
using all resource types offered by the electric utility
for customers who do not participate in the choice electric
program created under this section;

(v) Any other requirements, including
administration requirements, that the commission determines
are necessary for each electric utility to offer a choice
electric program to its customers.

(c) Nothing in this section shall be construed to
authorize an electric utility to offer electricity under
the choice electric program to customers outside of the
HB0174

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0338
territory specified in the electric utility's certificate
of convenience and necessity.

(d) The commission shall not grant confidentiality to
any electric utility for any information required to be
provided by an electric utility to its customers in
accordance with subsection (b) of this section.

(e) In determining just and reasonable rates for
electric utilities offering electricity under the choice
electric program required under this section, the
commission may consider and authorize electric utilities to
recover administrative costs associated with implementing
the choice electric program and the resource type
percentages requested or selected by customers from
customers participating in the choice electric program
under this section.

Section 2. The public service commission shall
promulgate all rules necessary to implement this act not
later than January 1, 2027.

HB0174

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0338
Section 3.

(a) Except as provided in subsection (b) of this
section, this act is effective immediately upon completion
of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided
by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming Constitution.

(b) Section 1 of this act is effective January 1,
2027.

(END)
HB0174